District of Columbia statutes.
6-1408.01

Building permit denial.

An applicant may be denied a building permit by the Mayor for a period of:

(1)

Ten years from the date of final order on a criminal conviction against the applicant for a Construction Code or zoning regulations crime;

(2)

Three years after receipt of 5 or more stop work orders by the applicant in any 12-month period;

(3)

Three years after final administrative adjudication against the applicant for violation of the Construction Code or zoning regulations; or

(4)

Three years from the date of revocation of a building permit or certificate of occupancy issued to the applicant.

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 8a
as added Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-24, § 2(c), 52 DCR 8080

History